Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7 Medical Assistance Generally
49-4-146.2.
Requirements for voluntary termination of provider agreements by nursing facilities; adjustment of medical assistance rate; decertification.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Assist” means that the provider will, at a minimum, do the following:

Provide the resident, the resident’s legal guardian, or the resident’s representative with the names, addresses, phone numbers, and contact persons at other facilities appropriate to the needs of the resident;

Contact the identified facilities initially in the resident’s behalf;

Develop a transfer plan for each resident that addresses the individual needs of the resident during the transfer;

Make arrangements for the safe and orderly transfer of the resident; and

Provide the resident, guardian, or representative with counseling regarding available community resources and informing the appropriate state or social service organizations, including, but not limited to, the community or state long-term care ombudsman and assisting in arranging for the transfer or discharge.

“Decertification” means and refers to termination of a facility’s limited provider agreement, at such time as no Medicaid eligible residents reside in the facility.

“Limited provider agreement” means and refers to an agreement between a facility and the department whereby the facility agrees to provide nursing facility services to Medicaid eligible residents and the department agrees to pay medical assistance for services rendered to Medicaid eligible residents during the period of time from termination notice to decertification.

“Medicaid eligible residents” means and refers to persons:

Residing in the facility as of the effective date of termination; and

Who are certified as recipients of medical assistance prior to the effective date of termination.

“Termination” or “terminate” refers to voluntary termination by a nursing facility of its current provider agreement with the department. Upon termination, the facility must enter into a limited provider agreement.

A nursing facility may voluntarily terminate upon 60 days’ written notice to the department. Such notice shall include:

The reason or reasons for termination of its current provider agreement;

The names and Medicaid identification numbers of all Medicaid eligible residents;

The names of residents with applications pending for Medicaid eligibility and the names of any representatives authorized to act for such residents in accordance with paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-8-102;

Copies of notices which the facility intends to provide to residents and applicants pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section; and

Any other information reasonably deemed by the department to be necessary to process the termination.

Any facility which voluntarily terminates its participation must do so in such a manner as to minimize the harm to current residents and applicants. In meeting this requirement, the facility shall:

Enter into a limited provider agreement;

Meet the requirements for nursing facilities enrolled as providers of medical assistance, except as otherwise set forth in the limited provider agreement and this Code section;

Assist residents who desire to leave the facility in finding alternative placement; and

With regard to residents who are not Medicaid eligible residents at the time of termination, but who subsequently become Medicaid eligible residents, comply with the applicable provisions of Code Section 31-8-116 (with the exception of the second sentence of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of said Code section).

The terminating facility must meet the following notice requirements. All notices required under this subsection must be approved by the department:

The facility shall notify each Medicaid eligible resident that:

The facility has elected to terminate its current provider agreement;

The resident may continue to reside in the facility as long as he or she continues to be a recipient of medical assistance; and

Should the resident wish to transfer to another facility, the terminating facility will provide orientation and preparation for transfer and assist the resident and the department in locating alternative placement;

The facility shall notify all other residents:

That the facility has elected to terminate its current provider agreement;

That the resident will not be entitled to have medical assistance paid on his or her behalf if he or she becomes a Medicaid eligible resident on or after the effective date of termination; and

Of his or her rights pursuant to Code Section 31-8-116; and

The facility shall notify all applicants on the facility’s waiting list that:

The facility has elected to terminate its current provider agreement;

No resident admitted to the facility after the effective date of termination shall be entitled to have his or her care at such facility covered by medical assistance;

The legal rights and protections that apply to all residents (regardless of source of payment) in nursing facilities enrolled as providers of medical assistance will not be available on or after the effective date of decertification;

The legal rights and protections under the Georgia Bill of Rights for Residents of Long-term Care Facilities and under other state laws will continue to be available after the effective date of decertification; and

If such applicant desires to apply to other facilities, the terminating facility will assist the applicant in finding alternative placement.

The terminating facility shall receive medical assistance at the per diem rate in effect at the time the facility notified the department of its intention to terminate until such time as rate adjustments are made under the state plan. At that time, the facility’s medical assistance rate shall be adjusted to the state-wide average medical assistance rate paid to the class of facilities under the state plan to which the terminating facility belongs.

The terminating facility shall be decertified and its limited provider agreement terminated at such time as no Medicaid eligible residents reside in the facility.

A facility shall file a cost report with the department for the fiscal period ending with the effective date of termination in the manner prescribed by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-146.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1048, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “Long-term” was substituted for “Long-Term” in subparagraph (d)(3)(D).

49-4-146.3.
Civil forfeiture of property and proceeds obtained through Medicaid fraud.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Civil forfeiture proceeding” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 9-16-2.

“Medicaid fraud” means:

A violation of Code Section 49-4-146.1; or

A violation relating to the obtaining of medical assistance benefits or payments under this article of any provision of:

Chapter 8 of Title 16, relating to offenses involving theft;

Code Section 16-10-20, relating to false statements and writings, concealment of facts, and fraudulent documents in matters within jurisdiction of state or political subdivisions; or

Code Section 16-10-21, relating to conspiracy to defraud the state or its political subdivisions.

“Proceeds” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 9-16-2.

“Property” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 9-16-2.

Any property which is directly or indirectly obtained by a person or entity through or as a result of Medicaid fraud in the provision of services or equipment under this article and any proceeds shall be subject to civil forfeiture proceedings in accordance with Chapter 16 of Title 9. This Code section shall not apply to cases involving alleged fraud by Medicaid recipients in obtaining medical assistance benefits.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-146.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1596, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 1998, p. 664, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1225, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-29/HB 233.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1596, § 1.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Sections 2 and 3 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Medicaid Fraud Forfeiture Act of 1997.”’

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1596, § 2, effective May 5, 1997, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The General Assembly finds that substantial financial losses to the state are being caused by acts of fraud directed at the Department of Medical Assistance and that there is a need to enhance the ability of the state to recover property and proceeds obtained through Medicaid fraud.
It is the intent of this legislation to provide a legal mechanism for the seizure and forfeiture to the state of property and proceeds obtained through acts of fraud committed to obtain medical assistance benefits or payments under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49.”

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1225, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable to civil actions filed on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 276 (1997).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

49-4-147.
Enforcement of liens, claims, or offsets against assistance.

Medical assistance payable by virtue of this article shall be subject to any claim, lien, or offset of this state against the payee and to any claim of the United States of America made against the payee pursuant to a federal statute, but such moneys shall not otherwise be subject to execution, levy, garnishment, or any other legal process; and no transfer or assignment of such at law or in equity shall be enforceable against the State of Georgia, the Department of Community Health, or the commissioner of community health; but medical assistance moneys, having been paid, are subject to all such actions and process.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

49-4-147.1.
Claims by department against estate of Medicaid recipients.

In accordance with applicable federal law and regulations, including those under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, the department may make claim against the estate of a Medicaid recipient for the amount of any medical assistance payments made on such person’s behalf by the department. A claim shall be made against the estate of a deceased Medicaid recipient only if at the time of application for medical assistance the applicant received written notice that the medical assistance costs could be recovered from the applicant’s estate and the applicant signed a written acknowledgment of receipt of such notice, the estate is otherwise subject to recovery, and if no hardship or other exemption exists. The commissioner shall waive such claim if he or she determines enforcement of the claim would result in substantial and unreasonable hardship to dependents of the individual against whose estate the claim exists.

The estate recovery program established pursuant to this Code section shall not be effective any earlier than May 3, 2006. In no event shall the department make claims against the estate of a Medicaid recipient for the amount of any medical assistance payments made on such person’s behalf prior to May 3, 2006.

The commissioner shall delay execution of a claim against the estate where the dependents or heirs agree to pay the full amount of the claim in reasonable installments.

To prevent substantial and unreasonable hardship, the commissioner shall waive any claim against the first $25,000.00 of any estate. No later than July 1, 2018, the department shall submit to the United States Department of Health and Human Services Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services an amendment to the state plan reflecting the provisions of this subsection. In the event that such amendment to the state plan is not approved, this subsection shall stand repealed in its entirety.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 917, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 775, § 3/SB 572; Ga. L. 2018, p. 244, § 1/SB 370.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “federal Social Security Act” was substituted for “Social Security Amendments of 1965”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “and” was inserted near the end of the second sentence of now subsection (a), and “May 3, 2006” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” in two places in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Pursuant to the terms of subsection (d) of this Code section, the amendment was submitted and approved effective July 1, 2018.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Estate recovery, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Medical Assistance, Chapter 111-3-8.

49-4-147.2.
Noneligibility of Department of Community Health to obtain nor be liable for interest on orders, judgments, and liquidated or unliquidated amounts; exemptions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 49-4-141, as used in this Code section the term “department” means the Department of Community Health or its officers, agents, or employees solely in their capacity as such officers, agents, or employees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 7-4-12, 7-4-15, 7-4-16, or 13-6-13, or any other statute or judicial construction thereof authorizing interest, the department shall not be eligible to obtain nor be liable for interest on orders, judgments, liquidated amounts, or unliquidated amounts unless such interest is:

Required by federal law or regulations;

Interest on penalties as required by Code Section 49-4-146.1;

Interest as required by Code Section 49-4-148; or

Incurred by a failure to pay the penalty which may be transferred to the Indigent Care Trust Fund under Code Section 31-8-153.1 within 30 days after the penalty is imposed, in which event interest shall be paid from the thirty-first day following such imposition at the same rate as interest on penalties under Code Section 49-4-146.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-147.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 7.

49-4-148.
Recovery of assistance from third party liable for sickness, injury, disease, or disability; compromise or waiver of claim; compliance; effective date.

Should medical assistance be paid in behalf of a recipient of medical assistance on account of any sickness, injury, disease, or disability for which another person is legally liable, the Department of Community Health may seek reimbursement for such medical assistance from such other person. The department shall be subrogated, but only to the extent of the reasonable value of the medical assistance paid and attributable to such sickness, injury, disease, or disability, to the rights of the recipient of medical assistance against the person so legally liable; the commissioner of community health may compromise, settle, and execute a release of any such claim or waive, expressly, any such claim, in whole or in part, for the convenience of the Department of Community Health. This Code section is cumulative of the remedies of the Department of Community Health which specifically include, but are not limited to, the use of hospital liens as provided in Code Sections 44-14-470 through 44-14-477; and further, the payment of medical assistance to a hospital provider shall in no way be construed to discharge the obligation of a third party to satisfy a hospital lien.

All insurers, as defined in Code Section 33-24-57.1, including but not limited to group health plans as defined in Section 607(1) of the federal Employee Retirement Security Act of 1974, managed care entities as defined in Code Section 33-20A-3, which offer health benefit plans, as defined in Code Section 33-24-59.5, pharmacy benefits managers, as defined in Code Section 33-64-1, and any other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service shall comply with this subsection. Such entities set forth in this subsection shall:

Cooperate with the department in determining whether a person who is a recipient of medical assistance may be covered under that entity’s health benefit plan and eligible to receive benefits thereunder for the medical services for which that medical assistance was provided and respond to any inquiry from the state regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service submitted not later than three years after such item or service was provided;

Accept the department’s authorization for the provision of medical services on behalf of a recipient of medical assistance as the entity’s authorization for the provision of those services;

Comply with the requirements of Code Section 33-24-59.5, regarding the timely payment of claims submitted by the department for medical services provided to a recipient of medical assistance and covered by the health benefit plan, subject to the payment to the department of interest as provided in that Code section for failure to comply;

Provide the department, on a quarterly basis, eligibility and claims payment data regarding applicants for medical assistance or recipients for medical assistance;

Accept the assignment to the department or a recipient of medical assistance or any other entity of any rights to any payments for such medical care from a third party; and

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the department solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, type or format of the claim, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale which is the basis of the claim, if:

The claim is submitted to the department within three years from when the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the department to enforce its rights with respect to such claim commenced within six years of the department’s submission of the claim.

The requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection shall only apply to a health benefit plan which is issued, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after April 28, 2001.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 9; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1520, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 348, § 1/HB 505; Ga. L. 2020, p. 654, § 6/HB 918.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection (b), substituted “benefits managers” for “benefit managers” and substituted “Code Section 33-64-1” for “Code Section 26-4-110.1”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “April 28, 2001” was substituted for “this subsection first becomes effective in 2001” at the end of the undesignated paragraph in subsection (b).

49-4-149.
Lien of Department of Community Health against third parties; subrogation to recipients’ insurance claims; assignment of recipients’ claims.

The Department of Community Health shall have a lien for the charges for medical care and treatment provided a medical assistance recipient upon any moneys or other property accruing to the recipient to whom such care was furnished or to his legal representatives as a result of sickness, injury, disease, disability, or death, due to the liability of a third party, which necessitated the medical care.

The department may perfect and enforce any lien arising under subsection (a) of this Code section by following the procedures set forth for hospital liens in Code Sections 44-14-470 through 44-14-473; except that the department shall have one year from the date the last item of medical care was furnished to file its verified lien statement; and the statement shall be filed with the appropriate clerk of court in the county wherein the recipient resides and in Fulton County. The verified lien statement shall contain the following: the name and address of the person to whom medical care was furnished; the date of injury; the name and address of the provider or providers furnishing medical care; the dates of services; the amount claimed to be due for the care; and, to the best of the department’s knowledge, the names and addresses of all persons, firms, or corporations claimed to be liable for damages arising from the injuries. This Code section shall not affect the priority of any attorney’s lien.

The department shall be subrogated, but only to the extent of the reasonable value of the medical assistance paid and attributable to any sickness, injury, disease, or disability, to the rights of medical assistance recipients to any benefits provided such recipients by virtue of private health care insurance contracts; provided, however, the right of subrogation does not attach to any recipient’s rights to benefits paid or provided under private health care coverage prior to the receipt of written notice, by the carrier who issued the health care contract, of the exercise by the department of its subrogation rights.

A recipient of medical assistance who receives medical care for which the department may be obligated to pay shall be deemed to have made assignment to the department of any rights of such person to any payments for such medical care from a third party, up to the amount of medical assistance actually paid by the department; provided, however, assignment does not attach to a recipient’s right to any payments provided under private health care coverage prior to the receipt of written notice, by the carrier who issued the health care coverage, of the exercise by the department of its assignment. This subsection shall apply to a recipient only if notice of this subsection is given to the recipient at the time his application for medical assistance is filed. The assignment created by this subsection shall be effective until the recipient of medical assistance is no longer an eligible recipient for medical assistance.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1520, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1293, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

49-4-149.1.
Submission by department of plan for family supplementation of Medicaid payments upon federal removal of restrictions.

If the federal government removes restrictions upon family supplementation of Medicaid payments or approves a waiver allowing this supplementation, the Department of Community Health shall submit to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health and Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives a plan for this supplementation, which submission shall be made within 30 days after the earlier of the date the restrictions are removed or the date the waiver is approved.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 824, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-4-149.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 824, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 5/HB 309.

49-4-150.
Regulations as to maintenance and use of records; certificate as to use of information.

The Board of Community Health is directed to prescribe regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the Department of Community Health relating to applicants for and recipients of medical assistance. Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 49-4-151, such regulations shall provide safeguards restricting the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for or recipients of medical assistance to purposes directly connected with the administration of the state plan. No person who obtains information by virtue of any such regulations shall use such information for commercial or political purposes, and any person seeking such information shall certify to the commissioner of community health, in writing, that the information obtained will not be used for commercial or political purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 10; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

49-4-151.
Obtaining information for investigations and audits.

The commissioner, for the purposes of investigating the nature, amount, and extent of services provided to a recipient of medical assistance or auditing information submitted to the department concerning a provider’s entitlement to an amount of medical assistance, is authorized, personally or by his duly authorized representative, to administer oaths and to examine and copy books, papers, records (medical, business, or otherwise), or memoranda of a provider or of any other person possessed of information relating to reimbursable costs claimed by a provider or otherwise relating to the amount of medical assistance to which a provider is entitled. The commissioner may compel such examinations by means of subpoenas issued to require the custodian of such items to produce them for examination. A subpoena may be served by any sheriff, by his deputy, or by any other person not less than 18 years of age. Proof may be shown by return of certificate endorsed on a copy of the subpoena. Subpoenas may also be served by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, and the return receipt shall constitute prima-facie proof of service. If any person shall fail to obey a subpoena issued and served under this subsection, then upon application of the commissioner, the superior court of the county in which such custodian was required to appear may issue an order requiring such custodian to comply with the subpoena and to produce the subpoenaed documentation. Furthermore, if any provider shall fail to obey a subpoena issued and served under this subsection with respect to any matter concerning a claim for medical assistance, that claim for medical assistance shall not be reimbursed by the Department of Community Health; and, if already reimbursed, the amount of medical assistance reimbursed shall be deducted from any amount of medical assistance which may then be or thereafter become payable to such provider.

In the course of conducting investigations and audits, the Department of Community Health may request from any governmental department, board, commission, bureau, or agency information and assistance pertinent thereto. The Department of Community Health shall be entitled to have access to all such pertinent information which is within the custody of any governmental department, board, commission, bureau, or agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 10; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

49-4-151.1.
Errors or omissions in reporting; right to hearing; exclusion.

Any clerical or record-keeping error, including but not limited to a typographical error, scrivener’s error, or computer error; any unintentional error or omission in billing, coding, or required documentation; or any isolated instances of incomplete documentation by a provider of medical assistance regarding reimbursement for medical assistance may not in and of itself constitute fraud or constitute a basis to recoup payment for medical assistance provided, so long as any such errors or instances do not result in an improper payment. An improper payment includes any payment that was made to an ineligible recipient, payment for noncovered services, duplicate payments, payments for services not received, payments that are for the incorrect amount, and instances when the department is unable to discern whether a payment was proper because of insufficient or lack of documentation. The department or its agents shall not recoup the cost of medical assistance if such error, omission, or incomplete documentation has been resolved in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section; provided, however, that recoupment shall be allowed to the extent that the error, omission, or incomplete documentation resulted in an improper payment, though recoupment shall be limited to the amount improperly paid.

A provider of medical assistance shall be allowed 30 calendar days following receipt by the provider of a preliminary audit review report in which to submit records or documents to correct an error or omission or to complete documentation identified in such review report; provided, however, that the department or its agents, in the discretion of the department, may reject the submission of a corrected record or document if the submission would result in an improper payment, or the provider demonstrates a pattern of repeated errors, omissions, or incomplete documentation. The department shall be authorized to establish rules and regulations delineating what constitutes a pattern of repeated errors, omissions, or incomplete documentation taking into consideration the type of provider; frequency of audits; volume of claims submitted by a provider; type of error, omission, or incomplete documentation; and other pertinent factors.

A provider of medical assistance shall be afforded the right to a hearing in accordance with Code Section 49-4-153 for any attempted withholding of reimbursement or recoupment by the department or its agents relating to an error, omission, incomplete documentation, or improper payment relating to the provision of medical assistance.

This Code section shall not apply to criminal or civil investigations which involve fraud, willful misrepresentation, reckless disregard, or abuse conducted by the Attorney General’s Medicaid Fraud Control Unit or other law enforcement agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-151.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 219, § 2/HB 206.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

49-4-152.
Research and demonstration projects; pilot projects to provide health care coverage and essential health care services; pharmacy assistance programs.

Subject to the availability of funds, the Department of Community Health is authorized to enter into agreements with and submit applications to departments and agencies of the government of the United States for purposes of accepting grants, receiving matching funds, and administering such grants and funds for research and demonstration projects pursuant to Title XI, XVIII, XIX, or XXI of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, or any other provision of federal law, without regard to the factor of state wideness and such other factors as may be required to be waived by the terms of the federal grant. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to the availability of funds, the department is authorized to establish pilot projects to provide health care coverage and access to essential health care services or benefits to the uninsured and underinsured, including but not limited to pharmacy assistance programs.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 11; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 9.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a hyphen between “state” and “wideness” was deleted in the first sentence.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “Title” was substituted for “Titles” in the first sentence of this Code section.

U.S. Code.

Titles XI, XVIII, XIX, and XXI of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in this Code section, are codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 1320d et seq.,

42 U.S.C. § 1395

,

42 U.S.C. § 1396

(XIX and XXI), respectively.

49-4-152.1.
Medicaid Prescription Drug Bidding and Rebate Program.

The General Assembly finds that the department frequently must pay more for prescription drugs furnished to recipients of medical assistance under this article than certain health care providers pay for the same products. In order to control more effectively the costs of such drugs, the department may establish a Medicaid Prescription Drug Bidding and Rebate Program as provided in this Code section.

The department may request sealed bids from prescription drug manufacturers for both brand name and generic equivalent prescription drugs specified by the department. The bids shall be proposed agreements by these manufacturers to adjust prices of drugs specified by the department to a price designated as the bid price when those drugs are supplied to recipients of medical assistance under this article. If the department has accepted a bid for a drug under this Code section, the department may not reimburse a provider of such drug for any equivalent drug not so successfully bid during the term of the contract awarded with regard to the drug so bid. The department may elect not to reimburse for any multisource drugs of a drug manufacturer which does not participate in the bid process or which bids prices considered excessive by the department.

All prescription drugs for which bids are submitted must meet applicable standards of the U.S. Pharmacopoeia, the State Board of Pharmacy, and be guaranteed as meeting all requirements, regulations, and comparison data under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the regulations thereunder. The manufacturer of a drug which is bid must have an FDA approved New Drug Application or an abbreviated New Drug Application and must have a product liability insurance policy extending to pharmacy providers under this article, but the policy may condition coverage thereunder upon the provider’s complying with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations promulgated thereunder.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to change the practice of pharmacies having provider agreements under this article with respect to their purchases and sales of and reimbursements for drugs furnished to recipients of medical assistance under this article. Adjustment rebates shall be made by the successfully bidding drug manufacturer to the department and be paid quarterly to the department.

In the event no acceptable bids are received for a drug for which a request for bid was made, the department may select a single drug supplier for the drug or establish one price for such drug which the department will reimburse therefor, but this shall not restrict the department from establishing one price for any drug upon which the department does not request bids.

Except when in conflict with this Code section, Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50, relating to state purchases by the Department of Administrative Services, shall apply to bidding and purchasing of prescription drugs by the department pursuant to this Code section. The prohibitions against financial interest in Code Section 50-5-78 shall be applicable to the commissioner and other employees of the department and any violation thereof punishable as provided in subsection (d) of that Code section. Contracts for the purchase of prescription drugs made in violation of this Code section shall be void and of no effect and liability therefor shall be the same as that provided in Code Section 50-5-79.

The department is authorized to accept rebates from any drug manufacturer for providing information to that manufacturer regarding utilization by Medicaid recipients of that manufacturer’s drugs as long as the anonymity of the recipients is maintained. The department is further authorized to verify and audit claims for reimbursement for drugs successfully bid, provide the manufacturers thereof with the information so obtained, and to adjust the department’s claim for rebates based upon that information.

The provisions of this Code section shall be construed in conformity with Code Section 49-4-157.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 852, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in subsection (c) of this Code section, is codified at

21 U.S.C. § 301

et seq.

49-4-152.2.
Rebates for sole-source and multiple-source drugs included in Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List.

The department is authorized to negotiate and enter into agreements directly with manufacturers and distributors whose prescription drug products are sold in the state for sole-source and multiple-source drugs to be paid for under the state plan for eligible recipients under this article. Such agreements shall provide for a periodic rebate of a negotiated percentage of the total product cost to be paid by the manufacturer or distributor of a specific product covered under the state plan.

Prescription drug products shall be included in the Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List only upon satisfaction and completion of the application and approval process established by the department. Those products for which a rebate has been successfully negotiated shall automatically be included in the Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List for a period of time conterminous with the negotiated rebate.

If there has been a failure to negotiate or renew a rebate agreement for a specific prescription drug product, the pharmaceutical manufacturer or distributor of that product shall disclose to the department its most favorable pricing arrangements available to state and nonstate government purchasers of such products. If the department determines that the product needs to be included in the Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List, the department shall establish the amount of the rebate for such product based upon the price information provided by the manufacturer or distributor. The determination as to whether a product should be included in the Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List shall be based upon the product’s efficacy, cost, medical necessity, and safety.

The provisions of this Code section shall be construed in conformity with Code Section 49-4-157.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1808, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in the last sentence of subsection (b).